Idaho, session 2025, S1013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 36-411, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-411. CERTIFICATE OF COMPLETION. (a) Hunter education. No hunting
license shall be issued to a person born after January 1, 1975, unless the
person has previously held a valid hunting license in this or another state
or unless such person presents to the department of fish and game or one of
its authorized license vendors, a certificate of completion in hunter edu-
cation issued by the department under the hunter education program or proof
that he holds the equivalent of such a certificate obtained either in Idaho
or from an authorized agency or association of another state or country.
(b) Archery education. On and after January 1, 1994, no person shall
be issued an archery permit unless that person presents to the department a
certificate of completion in archery education issued by the department, or
proof that such person holds the equivalent of such a certificate obtained
either in Idaho or from an authorized agency or association in another state,
or proof that such person has previously held a valid archery permit in Idaho
or another state or country.
(c) Trapper education. Any person who did not possess an Idaho trapping
license before July 1, 2011, is ineligible to obtain a trapping license un-
less that person presents to the department a certificate of completion in
trapper education issued by the department or an equivalent certification
obtained from an authorized agency or association. No trapping license is
required for a person to trap when accompanied by, and under the direct su-
pervision of, an outfitter or guide licensed under this title having a valid
Idaho trapping license and certified in trapper education for the species to
be trapped, provided that the person being supervised holds a license to hunt
big game in Idaho. The guide or outfitter supervising such person shall en-
sure compliance with all reporting requirements for each animal caught in
the mandatory trapper report and shall ensure compliance with all check and
tagging requirements for each animal possessed by the person being super-
vised.
SECTION 2. That Section 36-412, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


36-412. EDUCATION PROGRAMS -- INSTRUCTOR QUALIFICATIONS -- FEE. (a)
The fish and game commission shall prescribe and administer education
programs in hunting, trapping, and archery. Such programs shall provide
instruction in the safe handling of lawful hunting and trapping equipment.
The programs shall also include instruction on wildlife and natural resource
conservation, good conduct and respect for the rights and property of oth-
ers, and survival in the outdoors. The commission may enter into agreements
with public or private agencies and individuals in carrying out the provi-
sions of this subsection. Such programs shall provide instruction on:
1. The safe handling of lawful hunting and trapping equipment;
2. Weapon safety;
3. Wildlife and natural resource conservation and laws;
4. Good conduct and respect for the rights and property of others, in-
cluding laws prohibiting trespass and tampering with real and personal
property;
5. Species identification and non-target species avoidance;
6. Ethical practices;
7. First aid; and
8. Survival in the outdoors.
(b) The department of fish and game shall recruit competent volunteer
instructors. The department shall provide training for the instructors in
the safe handling of legal hunting and trapping equipment, conservation of
wildlife and natural resources, good conduct and respect for the rights and
property of others, outdoor survival, and other appropriate subjects for
training instructors. Instructors shall be issued certificates and shall on
a voluntary basis give instruction in education programs as established by
the department of fish and game to all eligible applicants.
(c) The commission shall establish fees for each program not to exceed
eight dollars ($8.00) for persons who are age seventeen (17) years and under
and not to exceed eight dollars ($8.00) for persons age eighteen (18) years
and older, to be assessed each individual obtaining instruction in hunter
education or trapping education for reimbursement for furnished materials.
All students successfully completing the course of instruction shall be is-
sued a certificate of completion.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.